Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1029.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 44 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 6HATE GROUP DATABASESec.601. Definitions.602. Hate group database.603. Intelligence information.604. Hate group unit established.605. Regulations.§ 601. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 123456789101112131415161718 context clearly indicates otherwise:"Appropriate agency." A department, board, commission or agency of the Commonwealth, the Federal Government or another state as approved by the Attorney General of the Commonwealth for access to the hate group database."Hate crime." A criminal offense against a person or property motivated in whole or in part by an offender's bias against a race, religion, disability, sexual orientation, ethnicity, gender identity or any other immutable characteristic."Hate group." A group of individuals, as designated by the Attorney General, who, based on the group's official statements or principles, the statements of group leaders or group activities, has beliefs, biases or practices that attack or malign a class of people and who may commit or attempt to commit a hate crime in this Commonwealth."Hate group database." The Statewide hate group database established under section 602 (relating to hate group database)."Intelligence information." Information concerning the habits, practices, characteristics, possessions, associations and affiliations of an individual or group of individuals compiled in an effort to anticipate, prevent and monitor hate group activity and investigate or prosecute hate crimes."Law enforcement agency." The Pennsylvania State Police and a police department of a city, borough, incorporated town or township in this Commonwealth. The term includes county district attorneys' offices and the Office of Attorney General of the Commonwealth, Federal law enforcement agencies and law enforcement agencies of other states in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the Attorney General to implement 20250SB1029PN1194 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this chapter.§ 602. Hate group database.(a) Establishment.--The Attorney General, in consultation with the Pennsylvania State Police, shall provide for the establishment of a Statewide hate group database.(b) Duties of Attorney General.--The Attorney General shall:(1) Coordinate, designate and facilitate the use of the hate group database established under subsection (a).(2) Ensure that the hate group database is configured to limit accessibility to law enforcement agencies and other appropriate agencies.(3) Utilize existing resources, networks or structures inside or outside this Commonwealth to:(i) Designate an individual or group of individuals as members of a hate group or affiliates or associates of a hate group.(ii) Evaluate and investigate actual and alleged hate crimes and hate group activity, including paramilitary activity or training, recruitment efforts and reports of overt or covert hate group activities in this Commonwealth.(4) Adopt and establish rules and establish regulations for entering hate groups and members, associates and affiliates of hate groups and hate group activity into the hate group database. Data on individuals may be entered based on reasonable suspicion, reports of alleged activity or actual criminal activity related to a hate crime.(5) Annually compile a hate group report, which shall include available data sources such as uniform crime reports, record management systems and entries into the hate group 20250SB1029PN1194 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 database.(6) Provide a secure link on the Attorney General's publicly accessible Internet website for public reports of hate group activity and initiate a public awareness campaign to encourage individuals to report hate crimes or acts of suspected hate group activity, including distribution of literature and other similar activities aimed at promoting messages of hate and intolerance.(7) Ensure that individuals entered into the hate group database are 16 years of age or older.(8) Adopt rules to govern access to the hate group database by appropriate agencies.(c) Compliance with Federal regulations.--The hate group database shall comply with Federal regulations for state law enforcement databases shared with other law enforcement agencies, including auditing and access to data.(d) Use of intelligence information.--The hate group database shall:(1) Contain intelligence information available to law enforcement agencies, other Commonwealth agencies, including the Department of Corrections and the Pennsylvania Parole Board, and Federal law enforcement agencies solely for tracking domestic terrorists, hate groups, hate group members, affiliates and associates and hate crime and hate group activities and incidents in this Commonwealth.(2) Provide an Internet-based multiagency, multilocation, information-sharing website or application for law enforcement agencies which operates as a network system.(e) Accessibility.--The hate group database shall be accessible only to appropriate agency employees approved by the 20250SB1029PN1194 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Attorney General.(f) Database use.--The hate group database shall be used for intelligence information and investigative information and shall not be used as evidence in any criminal, civil or administrative proceeding. Law enforcement may use intelligence information within the hate group database to obtain information external to the hate group database to formulate reasonable suspicion necessary to make a stop or arrest, except that the existence of intelligence information relating to an individual maintained within the hate group database shall not by itself justify a stop or an arrest.(g) Confidentiality.--The hate group database and the intelligence information maintained in the hate group database are exempt from public disclosure and shall not be a public record subject to disclosure under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.§ 603. Intelligence information.(a) Authority to collect and maintain intelligence information.--Intelligence information collected on an individual or group of individuals suspected or known to have engaged or attempted to engage in hate group activity in this Commonwealth, or any associate or affiliates of an individual or group of individuals, may only be maintained in the hate group database in accordance with subsection (b).(b) Collection of intelligence information.--(1) Intelligence information may only be placed in the hate group database if the following apply:(i) a law enforcement agency has reasonable suspicion of hate group activity;(ii) the intelligence information is related to hate 20250SB1029PN1194 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 group activity that would give rise to prosecution for a Federal or State offense for which the penalty is imprisonment for more than one year; or(iii) the intelligence information is not collected in violation of any law of the Commonwealth.(2) Access to the intelligence information contained in the hate group database shall be restricted to authorized employees of a law enforcement agency and cannot be accessed by any other person.(3) Intelligence information related to hate group activity may not be collected or maintained in the hate group database if the information concerns participation in a political, religious or social organization that is not affiliated with a hate group or the organization or support of a nonviolent demonstration, assembly, protest, rally or similar form of public speech unless there is a reasonable suspicion that participation by a subject of intelligence information is related to hate group activity.(c) Dissemination of intelligence information.--(1) Intelligence information may be maintained in the hate group database and disseminated if:(i) The information is reliable as determined by the Attorney General, a district attorney or other law enforcement officer.(ii) The department, agency or individual requesting the information is a law enforcement agency that has policies and procedures adopted by the Office of Attorney General, in consultation with the Pennsylvania State Police, which are consistent with this chapter and include:20250SB1029PN1194 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) Designation of a law enforcement officer or officers by the head of the law enforcement agency or a designee to request and receive intelligence information maintained in the hate group database.(B) Adoption of administrative, technical and physical safeguards and rules, including audit trails, to ensure against unauthorized access and against intentional or unintentional damages.(C) Labeling intelligence information to indicate levels of sensitivity and levels of confidence in the accuracy of the information.(iii) The intelligence information is requested in connection with the duties of the law enforcement agency requesting the information and the request for intelligence information is based upon a name, fingerprints, modus operandi, genetic typing, voice print or other identifying characteristic.(2) If the Attorney General or a designated employee of the Office of Attorney General or another disseminating law enforcement agency is notified that intelligence information which has been previously disseminated to another law enforcement agency is materially misleading or otherwise unreliable, the information shall be corrected and the recipient agency notified of the change within 30 days of notification.(3) The Attorney General shall establish retention schedules for intelligence information. Intelligence information shall be purged under the following conditions:(i) The data is no longer relevant or necessary to the goals and objectives of the Attorney General or other 20250SB1029PN1194 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 law enforcement agency.(ii) The data has become obsolete, making it unreliable for present purposes, and the utility of updating the data would be worthless.(iii) The data cannot be utilized for strategic or tactical intelligence studies.(4) Intelligence information about specific individuals in the hate group database shall be automatically expunged if:(i) no new or updated intelligence information related to hate group activity or the commission of a hate crime has been entered into the hate group database within the previous five years;(ii) there are no alleged or actual reports of hate group activity against the individual subject to expungement in any Federal, Commonwealth or state court;(iii) the individual has not been convicted of a new hate crime in Federal, Commonwealth or state court within the last five years; and(iv) if confined in a correctional institution, at least five years have elapsed since the individual completed a term of total confinement or sentence of probation or parole.(5) Each municipal police department accessing intelligence information maintained in the hate group database shall file a copy of its procedures with the Pennsylvania State Police for approval. The plan shall be reviewed within 60 days of receipt.(6) Each district attorney accessing intelligence information maintained in the hate group database shall file 20250SB1029PN1194 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a copy of its procedures with the Office of Attorney General for approval. The plan shall be reviewed within 60 days of receipt.(d) Secondary dissemination prohibited.--A law enforcement agency that has intelligence information on hate group activity or an alleged or actual hate crime, but is not the source of the intelligence information, shall not disseminate or disclose the intelligence information to another law enforcement agency and shall refer the requesting law enforcement agency to the law enforcement agency that was the initial source of the intelligence information. This prohibition shall not apply if the law enforcement agency receiving the intelligence information is investigating or prosecuting a hate crime or a criminal incident related to hate group activity in conjunction with the law enforcement agency possessing the intelligence information. Law enforcement agencies receiving intelligence information related to a hate crime or hate group activity assume the same level of responsibility for the security of the intelligence information as the law enforcement agency that was the initial source of the information.(e) Security requirements.--If intelligence information is maintained in the hate group database, each law enforcement agency collecting, requesting, storing or disseminating intelligence information related to hate group activity shall ensure the confidentiality and security of the information by:(1) Instituting procedures to reasonably protect any repository from theft, fire, sabotage, flood, wind or other natural or manmade disasters.(2) Designating, supervising and training all personnel of the law enforcement agency authorized to have access to 20250SB1029PN1194 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 intelligence information maintained in the hate group database.(3) Ensuring that:(i) if information technology is employed, the equipment, systems, software and networks used for maintaining and disseminating intelligence information are dedicated solely to purposes related to hate crimes and hate group activities; or(ii) if information technology is not employed, a law enforcement agency authorized to have access to intelligence information is accorded equal management participation in computer operations used to maintain and disseminate the intelligence information.§ 604. Hate group unit established.(a) Establishment.--Within 90 days of the effective date of this subsection, the Attorney General shall establish a hate group unit within the Office of Attorney General.(b) Procedures.--The unit shall develop procedures to track hate crimes and hate group activities in this Commonwealth and may investigate and institute criminal proceedings of alleged perpetrators of hate crimes.(c) Criminal action.--(1) District attorneys of the several counties of this Commonwealth shall have authority to investigate and institute a criminal proceeding for an offense related to a hate crime or hate group activity deemed to be a hate crime.(2) In addition to the authority conferred upon the Attorney General under the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act, the Attorney General shall have the authority to investigate and, 20250SB1029PN1194 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 following consultation with the appropriate district attorney, to institute criminal proceedings related to hate crimes and hate groups.(d) Standing.--An individual charged with an offense that the Attorney General deems a hate crime shall not have standing to challenge the authority of the Attorney General to investigate or prosecute the case, and, if any challenge is made, the challenge shall be dismissed and no relief shall be available in the courts of this Commonwealth to the individual making the challenge.§ 605. Regulations.The Attorney General may adopt and establish rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1029PN1194 - 11 - 123456789101112131415